Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 28 Recognition and Enforcement of Interstate Authority

15-28-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that any and all administrative procedures available to the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement under title 15, including, but not limited to, the ability to order genetic testing as provided in chapter 8, the ability to administratively subpoena records and to have access to information as provided in chapter 22, the ability to change the payee to the appropriate government entity as provided in §

15-26-4

, to order income withholding under title 15, to obtain administrative liens as provided in chapter 21, and to intercept insurance payment pursuant to chapter 57, shall be available to any and all state or federal agencies conducting activities to establish paternity, establish or modify child support and/or medical orders, enforce child support and/or medical orders or to locate individuals for the above purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 21.

15-28-2.
Penalty.

Any entity or individual who, without reasonable cause, fails to reply to a request pursuant to this chapter or who, without reasonable cause, fails to comply with a request within twenty (20) days of receipt shall be liable for a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation, to be assessed by the department or by the family court and the individual or entity shall be required to provide this information and/or comply with this request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 21.